Hawaii statutes.
§385-5 Maximum benefits payable. A
claimant's maximum potential additional unemployment benefits shall be thirteen
times the claimant's weekly benefit amount, and shall be determined in the week
in which the claimant first claims for additional unemployment benefits and
shall remain unchanged for the period specified in section 385-16. [L 1961, c
157, pt of §1; Supp, §93B-6; HRS §385-5; gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Although remedies provided by workers' compensation are
exclusive, it does not prevent employee from suing employer for intentional
infliction of emotional distress. 679 F. Supp. 991 (1988).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next